District of Columbia statutes.
29-611.01

Application to existing relations.

(a)

This chapter shall apply to a partnership formed after the applicability date of this chapter and to a partnership that elects, as provided by subsection (c) of this section, to be governed by this chapter.

(b)

On and after one year after the applicability date of this chapter, this chapter shall govern all partnerships, whenever formed.

(c)

After the applicability date of this chapter, a partnership voluntarily may elect, in the manner provided in its partnership agreement or by law for amending the partnership agreement, to be governed by this chapter. The provisions of this chapter relating to the liability of the partnership’s partners to third parties shall apply to limit those partners’ liability to a third party that had done business with the partnership within one year before the partnership’s election to be governed by this chapter only if the third party knows or has received a notification of the partnership’s election to be governed by this chapter.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

This section is referenced in § 29-601.02.

Section References